Massachusetts, session 194th, H1172.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 17S a new section:-
Section 17T. (a) For the purpose of this section, “detransition-related treatment” shall
mean any form of medical, psychological, or psychiatric treatment, including but not limited to
mental-health treatment, medical interventions, and surgeries, that stops, reverses, or helps an
individual cope with the effects of prior gender-affirming health care services, defined pursuant
to Section 1 of Chapter 9A.
(b) Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee of the
commonwealth insured under the group insurance commission that covers gender-affirming
health care services, defined pursuant to Section 1 of Chapter 9A, shall provide coverage for
detransition-related treatment. The benefits in this section shall not be subject to any greater
of 4

deductible, coinsurance, copayments or out-of-pocket limits than any other benefit provided by
the commission.
SECTION 2: Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 10Q a new section:-
Section 10R. (a) For the purpose of this section, “detransition-related treatment” shall
mean any form of medical, psychological, or psychiatric treatment, including but not limited to
mental-health treatment, medical interventions, and surgeries, that stops, reverses, or helps an
individual cope with the effects of prior gender-affirming health care services, defined pursuant
to Section 1 of Chapter 9A.
(b) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall provide coverage
under all benefit plans that cover gender-affirming health care services, defined pursuant to
Section 1 of Chapter 9A, for detransition-related treatments.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 47UU a new section:-
Section 47VV. (a) For the purpose of this section, “detransition-related treatment” shall
mean any form of medical, psychological, or psychiatric treatment, including but not limited to
mental-health treatment, medical interventions, and surgeries, that stops, reverses, or helps an
individual cope with the effects of prior gender-affirming health care services, defined pursuant
to Section 1 of Chapter 9A.
of 4

(b) Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued, delivered or
renewed within the commonwealth, which is considered creditable coverage under section 1 of
chapter 111M, and which covers gender-affirming health care services, defined pursuant to
Section 1 of Chapter 9A, shall provide coverage for detransition-related treatment.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting a new section:-
Section 39. (a) For the purpose of this section, “detransition-related treatment” shall mean
any form of medical, psychological, or psychiatric treatment, including but not limited to mental-
health treatment, medical interventions, and surgeries, that stops, reverses, or helps an individual
cope with the effects of prior gender-affirming health care services, defined pursuant to Section 1
of Chapter 9A.
(b) Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth and that
covers gender-affirming health care services, defined pursuant to Section 1 of Chapter 9A, shall
provide coverage for detransition-related treatments.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting a new section:-
Section 26. (a) For the purpose of this section, “detransition-related treatment” shall mean
any form of medical, psychological, or psychiatric treatment, including but not limited to mental-
health treatment, medical interventions, and surgeries, that stops, reverses, or helps an individual
cope with the effects of prior gender-affirming health care services, defined pursuant to Section 1
of Chapter 9A.
of 4

(b) Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement
delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth that covers gender-affirming health care
services, defined pursuant to Section 1 of Chapter 9A, shall provide coverage for detransition-
related treatments.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting a new section:-
Section 34. (a) For the purpose of this section, “detransition-related treatment” shall mean
any form of medical, psychological, or psychiatric treatment, including but not limited to mental-
health treatment, medical interventions, and surgeries, that stops, reverses, or helps an individual
cope with the effects of prior gender-affirming health care services, defined pursuant to Section 1
of Chapter 9A.
(b) An individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed and that
covers gender-affirming health care services, defined pursuant to Section 1 of Chapter 9A, shall
provide coverage for detransition-related treatments.
of 4